Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.850

Faculty tenure—Purpose.

It shall be the purpose of RCW 28B.50.850 through 28B.50.869 to establish a system of faculty tenure which protects the concepts of faculty employment rights and faculty involvement in the protection of those rights in the state system of community and technical colleges. RCW 28B.50.850 through 28B.50.869 shall define a reasonable and orderly process for appointment of faculty members to tenure status and the dismissal of the tenured faculty member.

[ 2015 c 55 s 228; 1991 c 238 s 67; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 32. Formerly RCW 28.85.850.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.